Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Chapter 56. Offenses Against Public Administration.

Cross references. —

For provisions on insanity and competency to stand trial, see
AS 12.47.

For provisions relating to punishment, see
AS

12.55.125

for imprisonment for felonies,
AS

12.55.135

for imprisonment for misdemeanors, and
AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For restitution, see
AS

12.55.045

.

For forfeiture of pensions of certain public officers convicted of crimes involving corruption, see
AS

37.10.310

.

For the Legislative Ethics Act, see
AS 24.60.

For the Alaska Executive Branch Ethics Act, see
AS 39.52.